src/morphology/stems/numerals.lexc
!! Numerals
!! --------
!! Numerals in Haida?

LEXICON num
+Num: # ;

LEXICON Numerals
sg̲wáansang  num ; 	!     1	
sdáng  num ; 	!     2	
hlg̲únahl  num ; 	!     3	
stánsang  num ; 	!     4	
tléehl  num ; 	!     5	
tlaʼúnhl  num ; 	!     6	
jagwaa  num ; 	!     7	
sdáansaangaa  num ; 	!     8	
tláahl% sg̲wáansang% gúu  num ; 	!     9	
tláahl  num ; 	!    10	
tláahl% ʼwáa% gä% sg̲wáansang  num ; 	!    11	
tláahl% ʼwáa% gä% sdáng  num ; 	!    12	
tláahl% ʼwáa% gä% hlg̲únahl  num ; 	!    13	
tláahl% ʼwáa% gä% stánsang  num ; 	!    14	
tláahl% ʼwáa% gä% tléehl  num ; 	!    15	
tláahl% ʼwáa% gä% tlaʼúnhl  num ; 	!    16	
tláahl% ʼwáa% gä% jagwaa  num ; 	!    17	
tláahl% ʼwáa% gä% sdáansaangaa  num ; 	!    18	
tláahl% ʼwáa% gä% tláahl% sg̲wáansang% gúu  num ; 	!    19	
tláalaay% sdáng  num ; 	!    20	
tláalaay% sdáng% ʼwáa% gä% sg̲wáansang  num ; 	!    21	
tláalaay% sdáng% ʼwáa% gä% sdáng  num ; 	!    22	
tláalaay% sdáng% ʼwáa% gä% hlg̲únahl  num ; 	!    23	
tláalaay% sdáng% ʼwáa% gä% stánsang  num ; 	!    24	
tláalaay% sdáng% ʼwáa% gä% tléehl  num ; 	!    25	
tláalaay% sdáng% ʼwáa% gä% tlaʼúnhl  num ; 	!    26	
tláalaay% sdáng% ʼwáa% gä% jagwaa  num ; 	!    27	
tláalaay% sdáng% ʼwáa% gä% sdáansaangaa  num ; 	!    28	
tláalaay% sdáng% ʼwáa% gä% tláahl% sg̲wáansang% gúu  num ; 	!    29	
tláalaay% hlg̲únahl  num ; 	!    30	
tláalaay% hlg̲únahl% ʼwáa% gä% sg̲wáansang  num ; 	!    31	
tláalaay% hlg̲únahl% ʼwáa% gä% sdáng  num ; 	!    32	
tláalaay% hlg̲únahl% ʼwáa% gä% hlg̲únahl  num ; 	!    33	
tláalaay% hlg̲únahl% ʼwáa% gä% stánsang  num ; 	!    34	
tláalaay% hlg̲únahl% ʼwáa% gä% tléehl  num ; 	!    35	
tláalaay% hlg̲únahl% ʼwáa% gä% tlaʼúnhl  num ; 	!    36	
tláalaay% hlg̲únahl% ʼwáa% gä% jagwaa  num ; 	!    37	
tláalaay% hlg̲únahl% ʼwáa% gä% sdáansaangaa  num ; 	!    38	
tláalaay% hlg̲únahl% ʼwáa% gä% tláahl% sg̲wáansang% gúu  num ; 	!    39	
tláalaay% stánsang  num ; 	!    40	
tláalaay% stánsang% ʼwáa% gä% sg̲wáansang  num ; 	!    41	
tláalaay% stánsang% ʼwáa% gä% sdáng  num ; 	!    42	
tláalaay% stánsang% ʼwáa% gä% hlg̲únahl  num ; 	!    43	
tláalaay% stánsang% ʼwáa% gä% stánsang  num ; 	!    44	
tláalaay% stánsang% ʼwáa% gä% tléehl  num ; 	!    45	
tláalaay% stánsang% ʼwáa% gä% tlaʼúnhl  num ; 	!    46	
tláalaay% stánsang% ʼwáa% gä% jagwaa  num ; 	!    47	
tláalaay% stánsang% ʼwáa% gä% sdáansaangaa  num ; 	!    48	
tláalaay% stánsang% ʼwáa% gä% tláahl% sg̲wáansang% gúu  num ; 	!    49	
tláalaay% tléehl  num ; 	!    50	
tláalaay% tléehl% ʼwáa% gä% sg̲wáansang  num ; 	!    51	
tláalaay% tléehl% ʼwáa% gä% sdáng  num ; 	!    52	
tláalaay% tléehl% ʼwáa% gä% hlg̲únahl  num ; 	!    53	
tláalaay% tléehl% ʼwáa% gä% stánsang  num ; 	!    54	
tláalaay% tléehl% ʼwáa% gä% tléehl  num ; 	!    55	
tláalaay% tléehl% ʼwáa% gä% tlaʼúnhl  num ; 	!    56	
tláalaay% tléehl% ʼwáa% gä% jagwaa  num ; 	!    57	
tláalaay% tléehl% ʼwáa% gä% sdáansaangaa  num ; 	!    58	
tláalaay% tléehl% ʼwáa% gä% tláahl% sg̲wáansang% gúu  num ; 	!    59	
tláalaay% tlaʼúnhl  num ; 	!    60	
tláalaay% tlaʼúnhl% ʼwáa% gä% sg̲wáansang  num ; 	!    61	
tláalaay% tlaʼúnhl% ʼwáa% gä% sdáng  num ; 	!    62	
tláalaay% tlaʼúnhl% ʼwáa% gä% hlg̲únahl  num ; 	!    63	
tláalaay% tlaʼúnhl% ʼwáa% gä% stánsang  num ; 	!    64	
tláalaay% tlaʼúnhl% ʼwáa% gä% tléehl  num ; 	!    65	
tláalaay% tlaʼúnhl% ʼwáa% gä% tlaʼúnhl  num ; 	!    66	
tláalaay% tlaʼúnhl% ʼwáa% gä% jagwaa  num ; 	!    67	
tláalaay% tlaʼúnhl% ʼwáa% gä% sdáansaangaa  num ; 	!    68	
tláalaay% tlaʼúnhl% ʼwáa% gä% tláahl% sg̲wáansang% gúu  num ; 	!    69	
tláalaay% jagwaa  num ; 	!    70	
tláalaay% jagwaa% ʼwáa% gä% sg̲wáansang  num ; 	!    71	
tláalaay% jagwaa% ʼwáa% gä% sdáng  num ; 	!    72	
tláalaay% jagwaa% ʼwáa% gä% hlg̲únahl  num ; 	!    73	
tláalaay% jagwaa% ʼwáa% gä% stánsang  num ; 	!    74	
tláalaay% jagwaa% ʼwáa% gä% tléehl  num ; 	!    75	
tláalaay% jagwaa% ʼwáa% gä% tlaʼúnhl  num ; 	!    76	
tláalaay% jagwaa% ʼwáa% gä% jagwaa  num ; 	!    77	
tláalaay% jagwaa% ʼwáa% gä% sdáansaangaa  num ; 	!    78	
tláalaay% jagwaa% ʼwáa% gä% tláahl% sg̲wáansang% gúu  num ; 	!    79	
tláalaay% sdáansaangaa  num ; 	!    80	
tláalaay% sdáansaangaa% ʼwáa% gä% sg̲wáansang  num ; 	!    81	
tláalaay% sdáansaangaa% ʼwáa% gä% sdáng  num ; 	!    82	
tláalaay% sdáansaangaa% ʼwáa% gä% hlg̲únahl  num ; 	!    83	
tláalaay% sdáansaangaa% ʼwáa% gä% stánsang  num ; 	!    84	
tláalaay% sdáansaangaa% ʼwáa% gä% tléehl  num ; 	!    85	
tláalaay% sdáansaangaa% ʼwáa% gä% tlaʼúnhl  num ; 	!    86	
tláalaay% sdáansaangaa% ʼwáa% gä% jagwaa  num ; 	!    87	
tláalaay% sdáansaangaa% ʼwáa% gä% sdáansaangaa  num ; 	!    88	
tláalaay% sdáansaangaa% ʼwáa% gä% tláahl% sg̲wáansang% gúu  num ; 	!    89	
tláalaay% tláahl% sg̲wáansang% gúu  num ; 	!    90	
tláalaay% tláahl% sg̲wáansang% gúu% ʼwáa% gä% sg̲wáansang  num ; 	!    91	
tláalaay% tláahl% sg̲wáansang% gúu% ʼwáa% gä% sdáng  num ; 	!    92	
tláalaay% tláahl% sg̲wáansang% gúu% ʼwáa% gä% hlg̲únahl  num ; 	!    93	
tláalaay% tláahl% sg̲wáansang% gúu% ʼwáa% gä% stánsang  num ; 	!    94	
tláalaay% tláahl% sg̲wáansang% gúu% ʼwáa% gä% tléehl  num ; 	!    95	
tláalaay% tláahl% sg̲wáansang% gúu% ʼwáa% gä% tlaʼúnhl  num ; 	!    96	
tláalaay% tláahl% sg̲wáansang% gúu% ʼwáa% gä% jagwaa  num ; 	!    97	
tláalaay% tláahl% sg̲wáansang% gúu% ʼwáa% gä% sdáansaangaa  num ; 	!    98	
tláalaay% tláahl% sg̲wáansang% gúu% ʼwáa% gä% tláahl% sg̲wáansang% gúu  num ; 	!    99	
hándad  num ; 	!   100	
